Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6170.1 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Community benefit expenditure” means an expenditure for an
activity or program or to an organization that seeks to achieve the
objectives of improving access to dental services and enhancing
dental public health. This includes an activity that:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1101 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. is available broadly to the public and serves low-
income consumers,
b. reduces geographic, financial, or cultural barriers to
accessing dental services, and if the activity ceased
to exist would result in reduced access,
c. addresses oral health workforce shortages, such as
advancing the education and training of oral health
professionals, or
d. leverages or enhances dental public health activities;
provided, community benefit expenditure shall not include any
expenses incurred for promotion, advertisement, or marketing by a
dental insurer;
2. “Dental coverage plan” means a health coverage plan that
includes coverage for the costs of dental care services and provides
coverage to employees and individuals;
3. “Dental loss ratio” means, for employer coverage issued by a
dental coverage plan, the ratio of incurred claims and other
compensation paid or due to providers, as defined in Section 6142 of
Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes, provided under a dental carrier
contract issued in this state, including, but not limited to:
a. related state and federal taxes,
b. related licensing and regulatory fee expenses,
c. nonprofit community benefit expenditures that have
been disclosed to the public to support dental
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1101 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

services and improve dental care access and quality in
this state,
d. the amounts or related payments identified through
fraud reduction efforts, and
e. any other related payments pursuant to state or
federal law,
excluding the reporting period;
4. “Large employer” means an employer who employed at least
fifty-one employees on business days during the preceding calendar
year and who employs at least one employee on the first day of the
plan year; and
5. “Small employer” means an employer who employed between one
and fifty employees on business days during the preceding calendar
year and who employs at least one employee on the first day of the
plan year.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6170.2 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. On or before June 30, 2027, and on or before June 30 each
year thereafter, a dental carrier that issues, sells, renews, or
offers a dental coverage plan shall file with the Insurance
Commissioner a report that includes the dental loss ratio for the
preceding calendar year reported by market segment. The initial
report shall include dental loss ratios for the calendar years of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1101 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2024 , 2025, and 2026. A dental carrier shall file the report in the
format or on forms determined by the Commissioner.
B. The Commissioner shall annually post all submitted reports
on a dedicated link or page on the Commissioner’s website on or
before September 15 of each year.
C. The Insurance Department shall evaluate the effectiveness of
informing the public on the dental loss ratio information reported
and make recommendations, if applicable, on the continuation or
modification of the obligation of dental carriers to report such
information.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 6, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1101 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)